Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 7

FEES,
TAXES AND DEPOSITS

PART I.
FEES

§431:7-101 Fees. (a) The commissioner
shall collect, in advance, the following fees:

(1) Certificate of authority:

(A). Application for a certificate of
authority...$900

(B). Issuance of certificate of authority
........$600

(2) Organization of domestic insurers and affiliated
corporations:

(A). Application for a solicitation permit.... $1,500

(B). Issuance of solicitation permit............ $150

(3) Producer's license:

(A). Issuance, regular license................... $50

(B). Issuance, temporary license................. $50

(4) Nonresident producer's license: Issuance........ $75

(5) Independent adjuster's license: Issuance........ $75

(6) Public adjuster's license: Issuance............. $75

(7) Claims adjuster's limited license: Issuance..... $75

(8) Independent bill reviewer's license:

Issuance......................................... $80

(9) Limited producer's license: Issuance............ $60

(10) Managing general agent's license: Issuance...... $75

(11) Reinsurance intermediary's license:

Issuance......................................... $75

(12) Surplus lines broker's license: Issuance....... $150

(13) Service contract provider's registration:

Issuance......................................... $75

(14) Approved course provider certificate:

Issuance........................................ $100

(15) Approved continuing education course
certificate: Issuance $30

(16) Vehicle protection product warrantor's
registration: Issuance $75

(17) Criminal history record check; fingerprinting:
For each criminal history record check and fingerprinting check, a fee to be
established by the commissioner.

(18) Limited line motor vehicle rental company
producer's license: Issuance...................................... $1,000

(19) Legal service plan certificate of authority:

Issuance before July 1, 2014.................. $1,000

Issuance on or after July 1, 2014............... $500

(20) Life settlement provider's license:

Issuance before July 1, 2014.................... $150

Issuance on or after July 1, 2014................ $75

(21) Life settlement broker's license:

Issuance before July 1, 2014.................... $150

Issuance on or after July 1, 2014................ $75

(22) Examination for license: For each examination, a
fee to be established by the commissioner.

(b) The fees for services of the department of
commerce and consumer affairs subsequent to the issuance of a certificate of
authority, license, or other certificate are as follows:

(1) $600 per year for all services (including
extension of the certificate of authority) for an authorized insurer;

(2) $50 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed producer;

(3) $75 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed nonresident producer;

(4) $45 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed independent adjuster;

(5) $45 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed public adjuster;

(6) $45 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a claims adjuster's limited license;

(7) $60 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed independent bill reviewer;

(8) $45 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a producer's limited license;

(9) $75 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed managing general agent;

(10) $75 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed reinsurance intermediary;

(11) $45 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a licensed surplus lines broker;

(12) $75 per year for all services (including renewal
of registration) for a service contract provider;

(13) $65 per year for all services (including
extension of the certificate) for an approved course provider;

(14) $20 per year for all services (including
extension of the certificate) for an approved continuing education course;

(15) $75 per year for all services (including renewal
of registration) for a vehicle protection product warrantor;

(16) A fee to be established by the commissioner for
each criminal history record check and fingerprinting;

(17) $600 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed limited line motor vehicle
rental company producer;

(18) $1,000 per year for all services provided before
July 1, 2014, (including extension of the certificate) for an authorized legal
service plan;

(19) $500 per year for all services provided on or
after July 1, 2014, (including extension of the certificate) for an authorized
legal service plan;

(20) $1,200 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed life settlement provider;
and

(21) $150 per year for all services (including
extension of the license) for a regularly licensed life settlement broker.

The services referred to in paragraphs (1) to
(21) shall not include services in connection with examinations,
investigations, hearings, appeals, and deposits with a depository other than
the department of commerce and consumer affairs.

(c) The commissioner shall notify the holder
of a certificate of authority issued under article 3 by written notice at least
thirty days prior to the extension date of the certificate of authority,
license, or other certificate. If the fee is not paid before or on the
extension date, the fee shall be increased by a penalty in the amount of fifty
per cent of the fee. The commissioner shall provide notice in writing of the
delinquency of extension and the imposition of the authorized penalty. If the
fee and the penalty are not paid within thirty days immediately following the
date of notice of delinquency, the commissioner may revoke, suspend, or
inactivate the certificate of authority, license, or other certificate, and may
not reissue, remove the suspension of, or reactivate the certificate of
authority, license, or other certificate until the fee and penalty have been
paid.

(d) Failure to pay the fee before or on the
extension date for a license or other certificate issued under article 9 or 9A
shall cause the automatic inactivation of the license or certificate effective
as of the extension date.

(e) All fees and penalties shall be deposited
to the credit of the compliance resolution fund. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
1993, c 205, §11; am L 1997, c 234, §1; am L 1999, c 163, §3; am L 2000, c 221,
§4 and c 288, §5; am L 2001, c 128, §1; am L 2002, c 39, §11, c 155, §12, and c
237, §2; am L 2004, c 122, §24; am L 2007, c 214, §1; am L 2008, c 177, §§2, 7;
am L 2009, c 11, §18 and c 77, §§15, 20; am L 2010, c 59, §§4, 5, 7(3); am L
2011, c 81, §4 and c 186, §8; am L 2012, c 256, §2; am L 2015, c 63, §6]

Cross References

Service contract providers, see chapter 481X.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next